Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.745

Child care consultation program—Creation, operation, and duties.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall establish a child care consultation program linking child care providers with evidence-based, trauma-informed, and best practice resources regarding caring for infants and young children who present behavioral concerns or symptoms of trauma. The department may contract with an entity with expertise in child development and early learning programs in order to operate the child care consultation program.

(2) In establishing and operating the program, the department or contracted entity shall: (a) Assist child care providers in recognizing the signs and symptoms of trauma in children; (b) provide support and guidance to child care staff; (c) consult and coordinate with parents, other caregivers, and experts or practitioners involved with the care and well-being of the young children; and (d) provide referrals for children who need additional services.

[ 2017 c 202 s 5. Formerly RCW 43.215.570.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2017 c 202: See note following RCW 74.09.495.